Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.615

Exemption from resident operating fees and technology fees for persons holding graduate service appointments.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the regional universities may exempt the following students from paying all or a portion of the resident operating fee and the technology fee: Students granted a graduate service appointment, designated as such by the institution, involving not less than twenty hours of work per week. The exemption shall be for the term of the appointment.

[ 1996 c 142 s 3; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 23; 1992 c 231 s 21; 1984 c 105 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1996 c 142: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.